North Carolina, session 2025, HB271.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Section 2.3 of the Charter of the City of Concord, being Section 1
of Chapter 861 of the 1985 Session Laws, as amended by City Ordinance No. 96-105, adopted
on November 14, 1996, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 2.3. City Council; composition; terms of office. The City Council shall be composed
of seven members, each of whom shall be elected by and from the qualified voters of the city for
staggered terms of four years each in the manner provided by Article III of this Charter, provided
they shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified."
SECTION 1.(b) Section 3.1 of the Charter of the City of Concord, being Section 1
of Chapter 861 of the 1985 Session Laws, as amended by Ordinance No. 1995-02-09, adopted
on February 9, 1995, and Ordinance No. 96-105, adopted on November 14, 1996, reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 3.1. Regular municipal elections; conduct and method of election. Pursuant to G.S.
160A-101, the Charter of the City of Concord, as set forth in Chapter 861 of the 1985 Session
Laws of North Carolina, as amended, is hereby further amended to implement nonpartisan
plurality for elections (G.S. 163-292) of the City Council.Regular municipal elections in the City
of Concord shall be held in the odd-numbered years and shall be conducted in accordance with
the uniform municipal election laws of North Carolina. The Mayor and the City Council shall be
elected on a partisan basis, as provided in G.S. 163-291."
SECTION 1.(c) This section shall not affect the filling of a vacancy that occurs for
the city officers of the City of Concord for a seat elected prior to the effective date of this section.
SECTION 1.(d) The question of changing the method of election shall be submitted
to the qualified voters of the City of Concord at the municipal general election to be held on
November 3, 2025, which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing
elections at that time. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Changing the method of election for the city officers of the City of Concord from
nonpartisan to partisan to officially disclose political affiliation of partisan candidates on the
ballot."
*H271-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(e) The Cabarrus County Board of Elections shall certify the results of
the referendum conducted under subsection (d) of this section. If the certification from the
Cabarrus County Board of Elections reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in
favor of the referendum set out in subsection (d) of this section, subsections (a) through (c) of
this section become effective at the first regular meeting of the Concord City Council in
December 2027, and elections in 2027 and thereafter shall be conducted accordingly.
SECTION 2.(a) Section 4.1 of the Charter of the Town of Harrisburg, being Section
4 of Chapter 111 of the 1973 Session Laws, as amended by Town Ordinance adopted on July 13,
2015, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 4.1. Regular Municipal Elections. Regular municipal elections shall be held on the
Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each in odd-numbered year, beginning in 1973.
Council members hall be elected on a nonpartisan basis and the results determined by plurality,
as approved in the North Carolina General Statutes.years. Town officers shall be elected on a
partisan basis, as provided in G.S. 163-291."
SECTION 2.(b) This section shall not affect the filling of a vacancy that occurs for
the town officers of the Town of Harrisburg for a seat elected prior to the effective date of this
section.
SECTION 2.(c) The question of changing the method of election shall be submitted
to the qualified voters of the Town of Harrisburg at the municipal general election to be held on
November 3, 2025, which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing
elections at that time. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Changing the method of election for the town officers of the Town of Harrisburg from
nonpartisan to partisan to officially disclose political affiliation of partisan candidates on the
ballot."
SECTION 2.(d) The Cabarrus County Board of Elections shall certify the results of
the referendum conducted under subsection (c) of this section. If the certification from the
Cabarrus County Board of Elections reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in
favor of the referendum set out in subsection (c) of this section, subsections (a) and (b) of this
section become effective at the first regular meeting of the Harrisburg Town Council in
December 2027, and elections in 2027 and thereafter shall be conducted accordingly.
SECTION 3.(a) Section 4.1 of the Charter of the Town of Midland, being Section 1
of S.L. 2000-91, reads as rewritten:
"Section 4.1. Conduct of Town Elections. Regular municipal elections shall be held in each
odd-numbered year in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws of North Carolina.
Elections shall be conducted on a nonpartisan basis and results determined by a plurality as
provided in G.S. 163-292.partisan basis, as provided in G.S. 163-291."
SECTION 3.(b) This section shall not affect the filling of a vacancy that occurs for
the town officers of the Town of Midland for a seat elected prior to the effective date of this
section.
SECTION 3.(c) The question of changing the method of election shall be submitted
to the qualified voters of the Town of Midland at the municipal general election to be held on
November 3, 2025, which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing
elections at that time. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Changing the method of election for the town officers of the Town of Midland from
nonpartisan to partisan to officially disclose political affiliation of partisan candidates on the
ballot."
SECTION 3.(d) The Cabarrus County Board of Elections shall certify the results of
the referendum conducted under subsection (c) of this section. If the certification from the
Cabarrus County Board of Elections reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in
Page 2 House Bill 271-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
favor of the referendum set out in subsection (c) of this section, subsections (a) and (b) of this
section become effective at the first regular meeting of the Midland Town Council in December
2027, and elections in 2027 and thereafter shall be conducted accordingly.
SECTION 4.(a) Section 3.2 of the Charter of the Town of Mount Pleasant, being
Chapter 77 of the Private Laws of 1883, as amended by Town Ordinance adopted on February
11, 2019, reads as rewritten:
"Section 3.2. Manner of Election; Term of Office
The qualified voters of the entire Town shall elect the Mayor and members of the Town Board
of Commissioners that shall serve staggered four (4) year terms. Nonpartisan plurality Regular
municipal elections shall take place every two years, be held in odd-numbered years, with three
commissioners being elected during one election cycle, and two commissioners and the Mayor
during the next election cycle, and so on. Absentee ballots are permitted pursuant to Board of
Elections requirements. The present Mayor, Commissioners and other officers of Mount Pleasant
shall hold said offices with all the powers, privileges, rights and responsibilities which this charter
and the former charter conferred until their successors are elected or appointed and
qualified.years and shall be conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws
of North Carolina. The Town officers shall be elected on a partisan basis, as provided in
G.S. 163-291."
SECTION 4.(b) This section shall not affect the filling of a vacancy that occurs for
the town officers of the Town of Mount Pleasant for a seat elected prior to the effective date of
this section.
SECTION 4.(c) The question of changing the method of election shall be submitted
to the qualified voters of the Town of Mount Pleasant at the municipal general election to be held
on November 3, 2025, which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing
elections at that time. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Changing the method of election for the town officers of the Town of Mount Pleasant
from nonpartisan to partisan to officially disclose political affiliation of partisan candidates on
the ballot."
SECTION 4.(d) The Cabarrus County Board of Elections shall certify the results of
the referendum conducted under subsection (c) of this section. If the certification from the
Cabarrus County Board of Elections reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in
favor of the referendum set out in subsection (c) of this section, subsections (a) and (b) of this
section become effective at the first regular meeting of the Mount Pleasant Town Council in
December 2027, and elections in 2027 and thereafter shall be conducted accordingly.
SECTION 5.(a) G.S. 153A-27.1(h), as amended by S.L. 2025-3, reads as rewritten:
"(h) This section shall apply only in the following counties: Alamance, Alexander,
Alleghany, Avery, Beaufort, Brunswick, Buncombe, Caldwell, Carteret, Cabarrus, Caswell,
Cherokee, Clay, Cleveland, Cumberland, Dare, Davidson, Davie, Forsyth, Graham, Guilford,
Harnett, Haywood, Henderson, Hyde, Jackson, Lee, Lincoln, Macon, Madison, McDowell,
Mecklenburg, Moore, Onslow, Pender, Polk, Randolph, Rockingham, Rutherford, Sampson,
Stanly, Stokes, Transylvania, and Yancey."
SECTION 5.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
vacancies filled on or after that date.
SECTION 6. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes law
and applies to elections held on or after that date.
House Bill 271-Second Edition Page 3